Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.310

Order of appointment for guardian.

(1) A court order appointing a guardian for an adult must:

(a) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established that the identified needs of the respondent cannot be met by a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative, including use of appropriate supportive services, technological assistance, or supported decision making;

(b) Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition;

(c) State whether the adult subject to guardianship retains the right to vote and, if the adult does not retain the right to vote, include findings that support removing that right which must include a finding that the adult cannot communicate, with or without support, a specific desire to participate in the voting process; and

(d) State whether the adult subject to guardianship retains the right to marry and, if the adult does not retain the right to marry, include findings that support removing that right.

(2) An adult subject to guardianship retains the right to vote unless the order under subsection (1) of this section includes the statement required by subsection (1)(c) of this section. An adult subject to guardianship retains the right to marry unless the order under subsection (1) of this section includes the findings required by subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3) A court order establishing a full guardianship for an adult must state the basis for granting a full guardianship and include specific findings that support the conclusion that a limited guardianship would not meet the functional needs of the adult subject to guardianship.

(4) A court order establishing a limited guardianship for an adult must state the specific powers granted to the guardian.

(5) The court, as part of an order establishing a guardianship for an adult, shall identify any person that subsequently is entitled to:

(a) Notice of the rights of the adult under *RCW 11.130.315(2);

(b) Notice of a change in the primary dwelling of the adult;

(c) Notice that the guardian has delegated:

(i) The power to manage the care of the adult;

(ii) The power to make decisions about where the adult lives;

(iii) The power to make major medical decisions on behalf of the adult;

(iv) A power that requires court approval under RCW 11.130.335; or

(v) Substantially all powers of the guardian;

(d) Notice that the guardian will be unavailable to visit the adult for more than two months or unavailable to perform the guardian's duties for more than one month;

(e) A copy of the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340 and the guardian's report under RCW 11.130.345;

(f) Access to court records relating to the guardianship;

(g) Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the adult;

(h) Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the guardian; and

(i) Notice of the removal of the guardian.

(6) A spouse, domestic partner, and adult children of an adult subject to guardianship are entitled to notice under subsection (5) of this section unless the court determines notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the adult subject to guardianship or not in the best interest of the adult.

(7) All orders establishing a guardianship for an adult must contain:

(a) A guardianship summary placed directly below the case caption or on a separate cover page in the form or substantially the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.665;

(b) The date which the limited guardian or guardian must file the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340(1);

(c) The date by which the court will review the guardian's plan as required by RCW 11.130.340(4);

(d) The report interval which the guardian shall file its guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.345. The report interval may be annual, biennial, or triennial;

(e) The date the limited guardian or guardian must file its guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.345. The due date of the filing of the report shall be within ninety days after the anniversary date of the appointment;

(f) The date for the court to review the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.345 and enter its order. The court shall conduct the review within one hundred twenty days after the anniversary date of the appointment.

[ 2019 c 437 s 310.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 11.130.315 was amended by 2024 c 267 s 5, changing subsection (2) to subsections (1) through (9).